District of Columbia statutes.
8-241.04

Indoor mold remediation obligations at residential properties.

(a)

A residential property owner who receives written or electronic notice from a tenant that indoor mold or suspected indoor mold exists in the dwelling unit or in a common area of the property shall inspect the property within 7 days and remediate the condition in accordance with subsections (b) and (c) of this section within 30 days of the inspection unless a shorter timeframe is ordered by a court or the Mayor.

(b)

Where professional indoor mold remediation is not required under subsection (c) of this section, a residential property owner notified of indoor mold by a tenant in accordance with subsection (a) shall clean and remove the indoor mold from the contaminated surface in accordance with the guidelines established under § 8-241.02(a)(4). Failure of the Director to issue guidelines under § 8-241.02(a)(4) shall not excuse the residential property owner from the obligation to clean and remove visible indoor mold from the contaminated surface.

(c)

If a residential property owner knows or has reason to know that indoor mold contamination exists in a tenant’s dwelling unit or in a common area of the property, the residential property owner shall cause the mold to be remediated by an indoor mold remediation professional.

(d)

The provisions of this section may be enforced pursuant to § 8-241.05.

Sept. 9, 2014, D.C. Law 20-135, § 305, 61 DCR 6767